New York, session 2025-2026, S2668.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 399-nnn of the general business law, as added by a 2 chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the general business law relating 3 to requiring charging cords for micromobility devices, mopeds, and bicy- 4 cles with electric assist to have a red tag attached, as proposed in 5 legislative bills numbers S. 7760-A and A. 8102-A, is renumbered section 6 495-b and amended to read as follows: 7 § 495-b. Tags on charging cords of micromobility devices, [mopeds] 8 limited use motorcycles, and bicycles with electric assist. 1. No 9 person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation shall manufac- 10 ture, distribute, assemble, recondition, sell or offer for sale at 11 retail any micromobility device, [moped] limited use motorcycles as 12 defined in section one hundred twenty-one-b of the vehicle and traffic 13 law, or bicycle with electric assist as defined in section one hundred 14 two-c of the vehicle and traffic law unless there is a red tag affixed 15 to the charging cord of such micromobility device, [moped] limited use 16 motorcycles as defined in section one hundred twenty-one-b of the vehi- 17 cle and traffic law, or bicycle with electric assist which clearly and 18 conspicuously states "UNPLUG WHEN NOT IN USE". Such tag shall include 19 additional consumer safety information regarding safe usage of the prod- 20 uct and its charging equipment and shall be affixed to the cord near the 21 end which is plugged into the electricity source. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02661-01-5 S. 2668 2 1 2. The department of state shall promulgate rules and regulations 2 providing guidance on the consumer safety information required to be on 3 the tag pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 4 3. The department of state shall post a model tag containing the 5 information outlined in subdivision one of this section that persons, 6 firms, partnerships, associations, and corporations can affix to such 7 charging cords as outlined in subdivision one of this section. 8 [4. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 9 the following meanings: 10 (a) "Lithium-ion battery" means a storage battery in which an elec- 11 trical current is generated by lithium ions embedded in a carbon carbo- 12 nate mixture or gelled polymer electrolyte. 13 (b) "Micromobility device" means an electric scooter as defined in 14 section one hundred fourteen-e of the vehicle and traffic law, an elec- 15 trical personal assistive mobility device as defined in section one 16 hundred fourteen-d of the vehicle and traffic law, or other personal 17 mobility device equipped with a lithium-ion or other storage battery, 18 including, but not limited to, a skateboard, unicycle, or other similar 19 wheeled device. The term "micromobility device" shall not include bicy- 20 cles with electric assist as defined in section one hundred two-c of the 21 vehicle and traffic law, wheelchairs or other electrically driven mobil- 22 ity assistance devices as defined in section one hundred thirty-a of the 23 vehicle and traffic law, or any vehicle that is capable of being regis- 24 tered with the department of motor vehicles. 25 (c) "Moped" means a limited use motorcycle as defined in section one 26 hundred twenty-one-b of the vehicle and traffic law.] 27 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 28 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the general business 29 law relating to requiring charging cords for micromobility devices, 30 mopeds, and bicycles with electric assist to have a red tag attached, as 31 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 7760-A and A. 8102-A, takes 32 effect.